Washington statutes.
RCW 17.04.270

Districts organized under prior law—Reorganization.

Any weed district heretofore organized under any law of the state of Washington may become a weed district under the provisions of this chapter and entitled to exercise all the powers and subject to the limitations of a weed district organized under this chapter by the election of three directors for such weed district which shall be done in the same manner as is provided in this chapter for the election of the first directors of a district organized under this chapter.

[ 1929 c 125 s 15; RRS s 2778-7.]